Utah statutes.
36-12-1.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1) (a)  "Interim committees" means legislative committees that are formed
from the membership of each house to function between sessions of the
Legislature in order to study subjects of legislative concern.
(b)  "Interim committees" includes a commission, committee, council, task
force, board, or panel, in which legislative participation is required by law,
which committee functions between sessions of the Legislature.
(2)  "Legislative director" means the director of the Office of Legislative
Research and General Counsel, the legislative fiscal analyst, or the
legislative auditor general.
(3)  "Major political party" means either of the two political parties having
the greatest number of members elected to the two houses of the Legislature.
(4)  "Professional legislative staff" means the legislative directors and the
members of their staffs.
(5)  "Standing committees" means legislative committees organized under the
rules of each house of the Legislature for the duration of the legislative
biennial term to consider proposed legislation.  As used in this chapter,
"standing committees" excludes appropriations committees, appropriations
subcommittees, and rules committees.
